Vermont, session 2025-2026, H645.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 1159a is added to read:
§ 1159a. PROCEDURE FOR EXPEDITED OR DELAYED
INDORSEMENT AND RECORDING
(a) Prior to indorsing a certificate on an instrument conveying any interest
in real property pursuant to section 1159 of this chapter, the town clerk shall
verify that the grantor, grantee, attorney for the grantor or grantee, real estate
broker or salesperson for the grantor or grantee, title insurer, or mortgage
lender:
(1) is registered with the Secretary of State as a secure real property
transactor; or
(2) has submitted documentation concerning the verification of the
grantor’s identity using a platform approved by the Secretary of State.
(b) The town clerk shall prioritize and expedite the indorsement of
instruments that meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) If the town clerk is not able to verify the information required by
subsection (a) of this section, the clerk shall provide notice to the parties that
the instrument shall not be indorsed or deemed recorded until the date that the
required information is received or 15 days after the date that the instrument
was submitted for recording, whichever is sooner.
VT LEG #386124 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.645
2026 Page 3 of 5
(d) The Secretary of State shall maintain a list of approved identity
verification platforms that may be used to verify the grantor’s identity in a real
property transfer. The Secretary of State may adopt procedures governing the
requirements that a platform must meet before being added to the list. At
minimum, the procedures shall establish minimum standards for the identity
documents used by the platform, data privacy and security, and methods for
verifying that the grantor is the person submitting the identity documentation
through the platform.
(e) The Secretary of State shall maintain a registry of secure real property
transactors. A person may register as a secure real property transactor by
submitting to the Secretary of State:
(1) an annual registration fee of $20.00;
(2) a statement that the person is a grantor, grantee, attorney, title
insurer, or mortgage lender; and
(3) documentation that demonstrates that the person uses an approved
identity verification platform to verify the identity of the grantor in real
property transactions.
(f) A person’s registration as a secure real property transactor shall expire
one year after the date of registration and may be renewed. A secure real
property transactor shall notify the Secretary of State and amend their
VT LEG #386124 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.645
2026 Page 4 of 5
registration if at any point during the term of the registration the secure real
property transactor begins using a different identity verification platform.
Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. § 2296 is amended to read:
§ 2296. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
In addition to the conduct set forth in 3 V.S.A. § 129a, the following
conduct by those regulated under this chapter constitutes unprofessional
conduct:
* * *
(5) failing to fully disclose to a buyer the existence of an agency
relationship between the licensee and the seller; and
(6) failing to verify the identity of a seller pursuant to section 2300 of
this subchapter.
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. § 2300 is added to read:
§ 2300. DUTY TO VERIFY CLIENT IDENTITY
Every real estate broker or salesperson who represents a grantor of real
property shall take reasonable measures to verify the identity of the client. A
real estate broker or salesperson may fulfill the duty to verify client identity by
using an identity verification platform approved by the Secretary of State
pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 1159a.
Sec. 4. 27 V.S.A. § 310 is added to read:
§ 310. ATTORNEY; AFFIDAVIT OF VERIFIED GRANTOR
VT LEG #386124 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.645
2026 Page 5 of 5
An attorney representing a grantor in any transaction that is subject to this
chapter shall verify the identity of the attorney’s client. Prior to the
conveyance of land or an estate or interest in land by the execution of a deed,
the attorney representing the grantor shall sign an affidavit stating that the
attorney has taken reasonable measures to verify the identity of the grantor.
The affidavit shall be included in the documents submitted for recording in the
land records and indexing in the general index.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386124 v.1